Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-251
Corporation's acquisition of its own
shares.

(MBCA
6.31) (a) A corporation may acquire its own shares, and shares so acquired
constitute authorized but unissued shares.

(b) If the articles of incorporation
prohibit the reissue of the acquired shares, the number of authorized shares
is reduced by the number of shares acquired.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 51.